nb: Håndverksmatte-/putefunksjoner: Vinkelmarkeringer; Antisklibakside; Polstring; Dobbelsidet; Lett å rengjøre; Rutenettlinjer; Bærbar; Reversibel; Selvhelbredende overflate; Annet
hr-HR: Značajke prostirke/podloge za izradu rukotvorina: Oznake kutova; Protuklizna podloga; Podstavljeni; Dvostrana; Jednostavno čišćenje; Mrežasta; Prijenosni; Upotrebljiv na obje strane; Samozacjeljujuća površina; Ostalo
en: Crafting mat/pad features: Angle markings; Anti-slip backing; Cushioned; Double sided; Easy to clean; Grid lines; Portable; Reversible; Self-healing surface; Other
pl: Charakterystyka maty/podkładki w rękodzielnictwie: Oznaczenia kątowe; Antypoślizgowe podłoże; Poduszkowy; Dwustronny; Łatwy do czyszczenia; Linie siatki; Przenośny; Odwracalny; Powierzchnia samonaprawiająca się; Inne
es: Características de la base de corte: Marcas de ángulo; Respaldo antideslizante; Acolchado; Doble cara; Fácil de limpiar; Líneas de cuadrícula; Portátil; Reversible; Superficie autorreparable; Otros
ja: クラフトマット/パッドの特徴: 角度マーキング; 滑り止め裏地; クッション; 両面用; お手入れしやすい; グリッド線; ポータブル; リバーシブル; 自己修復面; その他
ko: 제작 매트/패드 기능: 각도 표시; 미끄럼 방지 뒷면; 쿠셔닝; 양면; 청소가 용이함; 그리드 라인; 이동식; 리버시블; 자가 치유 표면; 기타
lt-LT: Rankdarbių pjaustymo kilimėlio / padėklo ypatybės: Kampų žymėjimai; Neslystantis pagrindas; Paminkštintas; Dvipusis; Lengvai valomas; Su orientaciniu tinkleliu; Nešiojamas; Dvipusis; Savaime išsilyginantis paviršius; Kita
zh-CN: 手工艺衬垫/垫子特征: 角度标记; 防滑背衬; 加衬垫; 双面; 易于清洁; 网格线; 便携式; 可正反用; 自修复表面; 其他
vi: Tính năng thảm/đệm làm đồ thủ công: Đánh dấu góc; Mặt dưới chống trượt; Có đệm; Hai mặt; Dễ vệ sinh; Đường lưới; Xách tay; Có thể đảo ngược; Bề mặt tự lành; Khác
fr: Caractéristiques du tapis/tampon pour loisirs créatifs: Marquages d’angles; Envers antidérapant; Rembourré; Double face; Facile à nettoyer; Lignes de quadrillage; Portable; Réversible; Surface autorégénérative; Autre
sl-SI: Značilnosti blazine/podlage za ustvarjanje: Kotne oznake; Protizdrsna podloga; Oblazinjeno; Dvostranski; Enostaven za čiščenje; Mrežne črte; Prenosno; Reverzibilen; Samozdravilna površina; Drugo
th: คุณลักษณะเบาะ/แผ่นรองงานฝีมือ: เครื่องหมายบอกมุม; แผ่นรองกันลื่น; มีแผ่นรองรับน้ำหนัก; สองด้าน; ทำความสะอาดง่าย; เส้นตาราง; แบบพกพา; พลิกกลับได้; พื้นผิวแบบซ่อมแซมตัวเอง; อื่นๆ
hu: Kézműves szőnyeg/párna jellemzői: Szögjelölések; Csúszásmentes hátlap; Párnázott; Kétoldalas; Könnyen tisztítható; Rácsvonalak; Hordozható; Kifordítható; Öngyógyuló felület; Egyéb
pt-BR: Características do tapete/almofada de artesanato: Marcações de ângulo; Proteção antiderrapante; Acolchoado; Dupla face; Fácil de limpar; Linhas de grade; Portátil; Reversível; Superfície autocurável; Outro
fi: Askartelumaton/-tyynyn ominaisuudet: Kulmamerkinnät; Liukumaton tausta; Pehmustettu; Kaksipuolinen; Helppo puhdistaa; Ruudukkoviivat; Siirrettävät; Käännettävä; Itsestään korjaava pinta; Muu
sk-SK: Vlastnosti kreatívnej rohože/podložky: Označenie uhla; Protišmyková podložka; Čalúnený; Obojstranný; Ľahko sa čistí; Mriežkové čiary; Prenosný; Obojstranný; Samoregeneračný povrch; Iné
zh-TW: 工藝墊/襯墊特點: 角度標記; 防滑背襯; 緩衝式; 雙面; 易於清潔; 格線; 可攜式; 雙面; 自癒表面; 其他
ru: Характеристики коврика или подложки для рукоделия: Маркировка на углах; Противоскользящая подложка; Мягкий; Двусторонний; Легко поддается чистке; Линии сетки; Портативный; Двусторонний; Самовосстанавливающаяся поверхность; Другое
el: Χαρακτηριστικά χαλιού/μαξιλαριού χειροτεχνίας: Σημάδια γωνιών; Αντιολισθητική ράχη; Με επένδυση; Διπλής όψης; Εύκολο στο καθάρισμα; Γραμμές πλέγματος; Φορητό; Διπλής όψης; Επιφάνεια αυτόματης αποκατάστασης; Άλλο
nl: Kenmerken knutselmat/-pad: Hoekmarkeringen; Antislipachterkant; Gedempt; Dubbelzijdig; Makkelijk schoon te maken; Rasterlijnen; Draagbaar; Omkeerbaar; Zelfherstellend oppervlak; Andere
it: Funzionalità del tappetino/pad di lavorazione: Angolari di marcatura; Supporto antiscivolo; Con imbottitura; Doppi lavandini; Vestibilità facilitata; Linee della griglia; Portatile; Reversibile; Superficie autoriparante; Altro
ro-RO: Caracteristici covoraș/suprafață pentru proiecte de artizanat: Marcaje unghiulare; Suport anti-alunecare; Amortizat; Cu două fețe; Ușor de curățat; Linii de trasare; Portabil; Reversibil; Auto-reparare; Altele
pt-PT: Características de criação de tapete/almofada: Marcações de ângulo; Suporte antiderrapante; Almofadado; Dupla face; Fácil de limpar; Linhas de grelha; Portáteis; Revertível; Superfície autocurativa; Outro
bg-BG: Характеристики на постелка/подложка за изработване: Маркировка на ъглите; Подложка против хлъзгане; С възглавнички; Двустранен; Лесен за почистване; С квадратчета; Преносим; Обръщаем; Самовъзстановяваща се повърхност; Други
da: Funktioner for håndværksmåtte/-plade: Vinkelmarkeringer; Skridsikker bagside; Polstret; Dobbeltsidet; Nem at rengøre; Gitterlinjer; Transportabel; Vendbar; Selvhelbredende overflade; Andet
cs: Vlastnosti podložky: Úhlové značení; Protiskluzová podložka; Polstrované; Oboustranné; Snadno čistitelné; Čáry mřížky; Přenosné; Reverzibilní; Samoregenerační povrch; Jiné
sv: Detaljer för hobbymatta/-dyna: Vinkelmarkeringar; Halkfri baksida; Dämpad; Dubbelsidig; Lätt att rengöra; Rutnätslinjer; Bärbar; Vändbar; Självläkande yta; Övrigt
de: Eigenschaften der Bastelmatte/des Bastelblocks: Winkelmarkierungen; Rutschhemmende Unterseite; Gepolstert; Doppelseitig; Einfach zu säubern; Gitterlinien; Tragbar; Umkehrbar; Selbstreparierende Oberfläche; Sonstiges
tr: El işi matı/pedi özellikleri: Açı işaretleri; Kayma önleyici destek; Yastıklı; Çift taraflı; Kolay temizlenebilir; Izgara çizgileri; Taşınabilir; Ters çevrilebilir; Kendi kendini onaran yüzey; Diğer